Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE D. JUDICIAL PERSONNEL AND OFFICIALS

CHAPTER 55. OTHER COURT PERSONNEL

SUBCHAPTER A. SECRETARIES OR STENOGRAPHERS FOR COUNTY JUDGES

Sec. 55.001. EMPLOYMENT OF SECRETARY OR STENOGRAPHER. (a) If the commissioners court on request of the county judge determines that a secretary or stenographer for the county judge is necessary, the court shall enter an order authorizing the county judge to employ a secretary or stenographer.

(b) The secretary or stenographer may be removed by the county judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 55.002. EMPLOYMENT IN JIM HOGG COUNTY. The county judge of Jim Hogg County may employ one person for stenographic and secretarial duties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.